test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuolban_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kuõlbân a-stem: # Noun 'kangasmaa' - full paradigm
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kuõlbân
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kuõlbbân
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kuõlbbân
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kuõlbbna
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kuõlbbnest
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kuõlbbnin
     kuõlbân+N+Ess+Indef: kuõlbânan
     kuõlbân+N+Par+Indef: kuõlbânad
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kuõlbbntaa, kuõlbbntää]
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kuõlbbân
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kuõlbbni
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kuõlbbnid
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kuõlbbnid
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kuõlbbnin
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kuõlbbnivuiʹm
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kuõlbbnâitaa, kuõlbbnâitää]
